Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 10
Pollution Prevention

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

[Reserved.]

Subchapter 2
— Arkansas Pollution Prevention Act

8-10-201. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Pollution Prevention Act”.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1273, § 1.

8-10-202. Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds that the timely development of a comprehensive pollution prevention and waste minimization plan for the prevention and reduction of the amount of solid, hazardous, and industrial wastes produced within the state is essential to determine the scope and need for off-site waste management facilities.

The General Assembly further finds that it is essential to ensure that the state fulfills its responsibilities under the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 to provide for the availability of adequate capacity for the management of wastes by implementing a comprehensive pollution prevention plan.

This plan should encourage the minimization of wastes produced by means of source reduction, process change, feed stock substitution, recycling, and reuse for both hazardous and nonhazardous waste streams.

Waste that is generated should be minimized to the greatest practicable extent, treated on-site, and stored and recycled or disposed of so as to protect human health and the environment.

The purpose of this subchapter is to prevent pollution, minimize the amount of solid, hazardous, and industrial wastes generated, and conserve energy within the state as expeditiously as possible.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1273, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, referred to in this section, is codified generally as 10 U.S.C. § 2701 et seq., 42 U.S.C. § 6991 et seq., and 42 U.S.C. § 9601 et seq.

8-10-203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Disposal” means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leakage, or placing of any waste into or on any land or water in whatever manner so that such waste or any constituent thereof might enter the environment or be emitted into the air or discharged into any waters of the state, including groundwaters;

“Generation” means the act or process of producing waste materials;

“Generator” means any individual, business, government agency, or any other organization that generates waste;

“Hazardous waste” means hazardous waste as defined by the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq., and rules issued pursuant thereto;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, joint-stock company, state agency, government instrumentality or agency, institution, or county, city, town, or municipal authority or trust, venture, or any other legal entity, however organized;

“Pollution prevention” means any action taken by industry, government, or individual consumers to conserve natural resources while providing and using needed products in a manner which prevents or reduces the generation, disposal, or release of pollutants to the environment.

“Pollution prevention” does not include dewatering, dilution, or evaporation prior to handling, release, storage, treatment, or disposal of hazardous waste; and

“Source reduction” or “waste minimization” means the reduction or elimination of waste at the source, usually within a manufacturing process, including process modification, feed stock substitutions, improvement in feed stock purity, housekeeping and management practices, increases in the efficiency of machinery, on-site closed-loop recycling, or any other action which demonstrably reduces the amount and toxicity of the waste exiting the production process.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1273, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 695.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (4).

8-10-204. Hierarchy of waste minimization.

It is the policy of the state to adhere to the following hierarchy of waste minimization and management:

Reduce waste production at the source;

Recover and reuse resources and wastes;

Recycle on-site or, if this is not feasible, off-site;

Treat wastes to reduce volume and toxicity, including incineration; and

Dispose of any remaining wastes in a manner which serves to protect the quality of air, water, and land resources.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1273, § 1.

8-10-205. Powers and duties.

The Governor shall designate the state agency or agencies which shall have the following powers and duties pursuant to this subchapter to:

Compile, organize, and make available for distribution information on pollution prevention technologies and procedures;

Compile and make available for distribution to business and industry a list of expert private consultants on pollution prevention technologies and procedures and a list of researchers at state universities providing assistance in pollution prevention activities;

Sponsor and conduct conferences and individualized workshops and seminars on pollution prevention for specific classes of business or industry;

Conduct feasibility analyses for innovative pollution prevention technologies and procedures;

Facilitate and promote the transfer of pollution prevention technologies and procedures between business and industries;

Develop, when appropriate, and distribute for voluntary implementation pollution prevention plans for the major classes of industry that generate and subsequently treat, store, or dispose of waste in the state;

Develop and make available for distribution recommended waste audit procedures and protocols for utilization by business and industry in conducting internal waste audits;

Provide on-site assistance upon request to business and industry for the purpose of identifying potential techniques for pollution prevention and assisting in conducting internal waste audits;

Compile and make available for distribution information on available tax benefits for the implementation of pollution prevention technologies and procedures by an industry or business;

Establish goals for voluntary waste reduction within the state, including the identification of key industries and businesses which should receive priority assistance;

Identify governmental and nongovernmental impediments to pollution prevention;

Develop the necessary information base and data collection programs to assist in establishing program priorities and evaluating the progress of reducing wastes;

Develop training programs and materials for state and local regulatory personnel and private industry designed to inform them about pollution prevention practices and their applicability to industry;

Participate in existing state, federal, and industrial networks of individuals and groups actively involved in pollution prevention activities;

Establish an award program for outstanding examples of success in pollution prevention and waste minimization; and

Publicize to business and industry and participate in and support waste exchange programs.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1273, § 1.

Subchapter 3
— Specific Pollution Prevention Measures

Effective Dates.

Acts 1995, No. 1191, § 44: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 1015, § 43: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-10-301. Sale of certain batteries prohibited — Disposal requirements — Definitions.

Alkaline manganese batteries manufactured on or after January 1, 1996, shall not be sold in this state if the alkaline manganese battery contains any intentionally introduced mercury, as distinguished from mercury which may be incidentally present in other materials, except, however, that the limitation on mercury content in alkaline manganese button cells shall be twenty-five milligrams (25 mg) of mercury per button cell.

Zinc carbon batteries manufactured on or after January 1, 1994, shall not be sold in this state if the zinc carbon battery contains any intentionally introduced mercury.

It shall be illegal to sell consumer mercuric oxide button cell batteries in this state on or after January 1, 1994.

As used in this subsection, “consumer mercuric oxide button cell batteries” means batteries which contain mercuric oxide electrodes, resemble buttons in size and shape, and are used in consumer products such as hearing aids.

On or after January 1, 1994, no person shall dispose of mercuric oxide batteries in municipal solid waste or in medical waste.

Mercuric oxide batteries are subject to disposal or recycling under the provisions of or pursuant to the provisions of the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq.

As used in this subsection, “mercuric oxide batteries” means batteries containing mercuric oxide electrodes, except that consumer mercuric oxide button cell batteries are excluded from the definition.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may promulgate, modify, or repeal rules as necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the purpose and intent of this section.

Any person violating any provision of this section or of any rule or order issued pursuant to this section shall be subject to the same penalty and enforcement provisions as are contained in § 8-6-204.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 952, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 696.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “or regulations” following “rules” in (e) and made a similar change in (f).

8-10-302. Construction of motor vehicle racing facility — Requirement — Definition.

Due to the noise, air pollution, and traffic congestion caused by motor vehicle racing facilities, no motor vehicle racing facility may be constructed in this state after passage of this act without the consent of at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the property owners and seventy-five percent (75%) of the registered voters within three (3) miles of the outside boundary of the proposed motor vehicle racing facility.

Such consent shall be accomplished by signing petitions that shall be filed with the city clerk if the motor vehicle racing facility is to be located within the boundaries of any city or town or with the county clerk if the motor vehicle racing facility is to be located wholly or partially outside the boundaries of any city or town.

The petitions shall indicate:

The name;

The residence address or, if a nonresident property owner, the address or legal description of the property located within the three-mile area; and

The date of the signature.

The petitions must be verified pursuant to § 7-9-109.

Signatures shall become invalid sixty (60) days after signing.

It shall be the duty of the county clerk or city clerk, as the case may be, to determine the sufficiency of the signatures and to certify the sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures in writing to the Division of Environmental Quality.

As used in this section, “motor vehicle racing facility” means any facility designed and used for competitive racing by automobiles or trucks that are modified for racing.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1191, § 40; 1997, No. 551, § 2; 1997, No. 1015, § 35; 1999, No. 674, § 1; 2005, No. 1409, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 3002.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to § 1-2-207, the repeal of this section by Acts 1997, No. 551, § 2 was superseded by the amendment of this section by Acts 1997, No. 1015.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this act” in subdivision (a)(1), Acts 1995, No. 1191 was approved on April 11, 1995, and became effective July 1, 1995.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(2)(C)(iii).

8-10-303. Permit requirement — Definition.

Due to the noise pollution and air pollution from the racing vehicles and traffic congestion caused by motor vehicle racing facilities, no motor vehicle racing facility shall be constructed in this state after passage of this section without the consent of at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the property owners and seventy-five percent (75%) of the registered voters within three (3) miles of the outside boundary of the proposed motor vehicle racing facility and without an annual permit issued by the Division of Environmental Quality.

The consent shall be required for the initial annual permit only.

Consent shall be accomplished by signing petitions which shall be filed with the city clerk if the motor vehicle racing facility is to be located within the boundaries of any city or town or with the county clerk if the motor vehicle racing facility is to be located wholly or partially outside the boundaries of any city or town.

The petitions shall indicate:

The name;

The residence address or, if a nonresident property owner, the address or legal description of the property located within the three-mile area; and

The date of the signature.

The petitions must be verified pursuant to § 7-9-109.

Signatures shall become invalid sixty (60) days after signing.

It shall be the duty of the county clerk or city clerk, as the case may be, to determine the sufficiency of the signatures and to certify the sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures in writing to the division.

Once the sufficiency of the petitions is determined, the persons or entity proposing and constructing a motor vehicle racing facility after August 1, 1997, shall seek the approval of and issuance of an annual permit from the division. The division's approval shall be sought by filing a permit application with the division.

Initial permit applications for new motor vehicle racing facilities to be constructed shall have attached a written proposal for the motor vehicle racing facility containing the substance of the proposed facility, including:

A description of the types of motor vehicles proposed for racing at the motor vehicle racing facility;

The maximum projected noise level of the racing vehicles;

A description of the kinds of races and the types of buildings, stands, or other physical plant proposed for the motor vehicle racing facility;

Estimates of traffic counts and numbers of spectators; and

Any other relevant permit information as may be determined necessary for the permit application by the division.

For the initial permit application for new motor vehicle racing facilities to be constructed, the division shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed motor vehicle racing facility. The division shall set a date for the public hearing to be held on the proposed motor vehicle racing facility permit which shall not be less than thirty (30) days after the filing of the initial permit application. The hearing under this subdivision (a)(3)(B) for the initial permit may be adjourned and continued if necessary. In its discretion, the division may hold public hearings for the renewal of any permits as is necessary. Any interested persons may appear and contest the granting of the approval or renewal of the motor vehicle racing facility permit. Affidavits in support of or against the proposed motor vehicle racing facility or a permit renewal, which may be prepared and submitted, shall be examined by the division.

After the hearing for the initial permit or upon application for the renewal of its annual permit, if the division shall be satisfied that the benefits of the motor vehicle racing facility are sustained by proof and outweigh its impact by the noise, air pollution, and traffic congestion caused by motor vehicle racing facilities, then the division shall grant the initial permit approving the proposed motor vehicle racing facility or shall renew approval to the permitted or existing motor vehicle racing facility. Renewal of an annual permit may also be denied if:

The motor vehicle racing facility is determined to be in violation of any standards under which the permit was issued;

The motor vehicle racing facility is constructed or is being operated in a manner that is materially different than was represented during the petition process; or

Fraud, misrepresentation, or false statement of facts was used to obtain signatures for the petition process.

If any material changes, additions, or improvements are made to the motor vehicle racing facility, the permit shall be amended accordingly, and the division may reconsider the approval of the permit.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have the authority to promulgate all necessary rules to implement this section, including the authority to set a permit fee to recover the cost of issuing the permit.

As used in this section, “motor vehicle racing facility” means any facility designed and used for competitive racing by automobiles or trucks that are modified for racing.

Within one (1) year of August 1, 1999, each motor vehicle racing facility constructed in Arkansas after January 1, 1995, shall apply for and shall receive an initial annual permit to operate its motor vehicle racing facility. Thereafter, upon the annual renewal date for its permit, the motor vehicle racing facility constructed after January 1, 1995, shall apply annually for renewal of its permit.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 551, § 1; 1999, No. 674, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, §§ 117, 118; 2005, No. 1409, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 697; 2019, No. 910, §§
3003-3007.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this section” in subdivision (a)(1)(A), Acts 1997, No. 551, was approved on March 17, 1997, and became effective August 1, 1997.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(3)(E).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the rest of the section.

8-10-304. Motor vehicle racing facilities in certain municipalities — Definition.

Sections 8-10-302 and 8-10-303 do not apply to any motor vehicle racing facilities located in a county having a population between eighty thousand (80,000) and ninety thousand (90,000) according to the 1990 Federal Decennial Census and that are:

South of a navigable waterway that traverses the state; or

More than two (2) miles from an interstate highway, public or private school, or church facility in place at the time of the original permit application.

A person or entity proposing and constructing a motor vehicle racing facility under subsection (a) of this section shall seek the approval of and issuance of an annual permit from the Division of Environmental Quality.

The division's approval shall be sought by filing a permit application with the division, which shall contain a written proposal for the motor vehicle racing facility containing the substance of the proposed facility, including:

A description of the types of motor vehicles proposed for racing at the motor vehicle racing facility;

The maximum projected noise level of the racing vehicles;

A description of the kinds of races and the types of buildings, stands, or other physical plants proposed for the motor vehicle racing facility;

Estimates of traffic counts and numbers of spectators; and

Any other relevant permit information as may be determined necessary for the permit application by the division.

For the initial permit application for new motor vehicle racing facilities to be constructed, the division shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed motor vehicle racing facility.

The division shall set a date for the public hearing to be held on the proposed motor vehicle racing facility permit which shall not be fewer than thirty (30) days after the filing of the initial permit application.

The hearing under this subdivision (b)(2) for the initial permit may be adjourned and continued if necessary.

The division, in its discretion, may hold public hearings for the renewal of any permits as is necessary.

Any interested persons may appear and contest the granting of the approval or renewal of the motor vehicle racing facility permit.

Affidavits in support of or against the proposed motor vehicle racing facility or a permit renewal, which may be prepared and submitted, shall be examined by the division.

After the hearing for the initial permit or upon application for the renewal of its annual permit, if the division is satisfied that the benefits of the motor vehicle racing facility are sustained by proof and outweigh its impact by the noise, air pollution, and traffic congestion caused by motor vehicle racing facilities, then the division shall grant the initial permit approving the proposed motor vehicle racing facility or shall renew approval to the permitted or existing motor vehicle racing facility.

Renewal of an annual permit may also be denied if:

The motor vehicle racing facility is determined to be in violation of any standards under which the permit was issued; or

The motor vehicle racing facility is constructed or is being operated in a manner that is materially different than was represented during the initial application process.

If any material changes, additions, or improvements are made to the motor vehicle racing facility, the permit shall be amended accordingly, and the division may reconsider the approval of the permit.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have the authority to promulgate any and all necessary rules to implement this section, including the authority to set a permit fee to recover the cost of issuing the permit.

Each motor vehicle racing facility constructed in an area under this section that applies for and receives an initial annual permit to operate its motor vehicle racing facility shall thereafter apply annually for renewal of its permit.

As used in this section, “motor vehicle racing facility” means any facility designed and used for competitive racing by automobiles or trucks that are modified for racing.

Due to the noise pollution and air pollution from the racing vehicles and traffic congestion caused by motor vehicle racing facilities, no motor vehicle racing facility shall be permitted or constructed under this section within one (1) mile of the boundary of another county.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1413, § 1; 2009, No. 1287, §§ 1-3; 2019, No. 315, § 698; 2019, No. 910, §§
3008-3014.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote (a) and (b)(1)(A); and substituted “one (1) mile” for “three (3) miles” in (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(1)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (b).

Subchapter 4
— Public Surface Water Supply Protection Act

8-10-401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Surface Water Supply Protection Act”.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1484, §
1.

8-10-402. Legislative findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that:

Clean water resources are essential to being able to effectively provide economic opportunities in the state; and

Protecting the water resources of the state will improve Arkansas's ability to promote the abundant assets of the state as the land of opportunity and encourage the development of additional economic opportunities in Arkansas.

The purpose of this subchapter is to encourage petroleum pipeline owners and operators to work with the state to protect and improve water resources and economic opportunities in Arkansas by reducing the risk of pipeline petroleum spills into the public surface water drinking supplies in the state.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1484, §
1.

8-10-403. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Petroleum” means crude oil, gasoline, or any other nonvaporous petroleum product carried in a pipeline that crosses into the watershed of a public surface water supply;

“Public surface water supply” means a body of water, including without limitation a river, lake, reservoir, or other impoundment and the watershed that drains into the river, lake, reservoir, or other impoundment that is owned, leased, or otherwise used by a public water provider.

“Public surface water supply” does not include water contained in an aquifer or aboveground water storage tank;

“Public water provider” means an entity that provides water for domestic, business, or industrial purposes.

“Public water provider” includes without limitation a consolidated waterworks system created under the Consolidated Waterworks Authorization Act, § 25-20-301 et seq., city government, county government, regional water district, and nonprofit organization; and

“Watercourse” means a river, stream, bayou, cove, or canal.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1484, §
1.

8-10-404. Cut-off valve and training.

For each petroleum pipeline that crosses a watercourse that empties into a public surface water supply above ground or below ground, the owner or operator of the petroleum pipeline is encouraged to:

Install a cut-off valve capable of:

Automatically sensing a loss of petroleum flowing in the petroleum pipeline; and

Automatically and manually cutting off the flow of petroleum on each side of each watercourse that discharges into a public surface water supply; and

Provide annually to critical staff for the petroleum pipeline operator, the public water provider, and state and local emergency response providers either direct training or funding for training by a third party.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1484, §
1.

8-10-405. Risk mitigation and response plan.

An owner or operator of a petroleum pipeline is encouraged to create a detailed risk mitigation and response plan for each petroleum pipeline in the watershed of a public surface water supply.

An effective risk mitigation and response plan under subsection (a) of this section:

States clearly each party responsible for implementing the risk mitigation and response plan on behalf of the petroleum pipeline owner or operator; and

Includes at least the following:

Quarterly visual inspection of each petroleum pipeline;

An early notification system for each relevant public water provider;

Plans for the construction of containment berms;

Detailed information on the product being carried in each petroleum pipeline;

The annual training requirements for emergency response personnel; and

A safety-related capital improvement plan that includes without limitation the following:

The removal of aboveground petroleum pipeline crossings;

The installation of additional valves and valve controls; and

The construction of additional response structures and facilities.

The petroleum pipeline owner or operator is encouraged to submit any risk mitigation and response plan developed under this section to the Department of Health and the appropriate public water provider for comment.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1484, §
1.